assets/hyph-de-1996.dic
UTF-8
% title: German Hyphenation Patterns (Reformed Orthography, 2006)
%
% notice: TeX-Trennmuster für die reformierte (2006) deutsche Rechtschreibung
%
% version: 2024-02-28
%
% authors:
%   -
%     name:    Deutschsprachige Trennmustermannschaft
%     contact: trennmuster@dante.de
%
% copyright: Copyright (c) 2013-2024
%            Stephan Hennig, Werner Lemberg, Günter Milde,
%            Sander van Geloven, Georg Pfeiffer, Gisbert W. Selke,
%            Tobias Wendorf, Keno Wehr
%
% licence:
%     name: MIT
%     url:  https://opensource.org/licenses/mit-license.php
%     text: >
%           Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person
%           obtaining a copy of this software and associated documentation
%           files (the “Software”), to deal in the Software without
%           restriction, including without limitation the rights to use,
%           copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense, and/or
%           sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the
%           Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following
%           conditions:
%
%           The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be
%           included in all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
%
%           THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED “AS IS”, WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND,
%           EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES
%           OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND
%           NONINFRINGEMENT.  IN NO EVENT SHALL THE AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT
%           HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER LIABILITY,
%           WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING
%           FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR
%           OTHER DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
%
% source: https://repo.or.cz/w/wortliste.git?a=commit;h=304aaa2188a75e57afe36bad0443d90a9c715b8e
%
% language:
%     name: German, reformed spelling
%     tag:  de-1996
%
% hyphenmins:
%     generation:
%         left:  2
%         right: 2
%     typesetting:
%         left:  2
%         right: 2
%
% texlive:
%     encoding: ec
%     babelname: ngerman
%     use_old_patterns_comment: Kept for the sake of backward compatibility, but newer and better patterns by WL are available.
%     legacy_patterns: dehyphn.tex
%     message: German hyphenation patterns (reformed orthography)
%     package: german
%
% ===========================================================================
\message{Ger5man
\1me
\me2s1s
\mes1sa
\messa1g
\message{Ger3ma
\message{Ge2r1m
Hyphenati1on2
H2y1p
Hy1ph
Hyphe2n1a
Hyphe1na1t
Hyphen2at2i
Hyphena3tio
Patter2n1s
P4atter
Pa1t
Pa2t1t
Patte2rn
(Refor3me1d
(Re1f
(R2e1fo
(Re3f2o2r1m
(Refor1me
Orthography,
O2r1t
Orth2o1g
Orthogr2
Orthogr2a1ph
2006)
`dehyphn-x'
`1d
`de1hy
`de1h2y1p
`dehy1ph
`dehy2p2hn
2024-02-28
(WL)}
(WL2006)
\patterns{
\1pa
\p4atter
\pa1t
\pa2t1t
\patte2rn
\patter2n1s
.ab3a
.a1b
.a2b1b2
.ab5e2r1k2
.ab2er
.ab5e2r4r2
.ab2i2
.ab3i1t
.ab3l2
.ab5le
.2ab3ol
.ab2o
.ab3or
.ab3sa
.1a2b1s
.ab5so
.2ab3u
.ach4sa
.a2c2hs
.ach1se4
.4ach4sp2
.ach2ts4
.a2c2h1t
.a1ck4e
.ac2k
.ae2
.aer6s2c2h4l
.2ae2r1s
.aer1sc
.ago3
.a1g
.ag4r2
.ag2u
.ai2s
.ak6t5en6de.
.a2k1t
.ak3te2n
.akte2n1d
.ak6t5en6den
.ak6t5en6des
.al4bl2
.a2l1b
.alb3r2
.al4bra
.alb6rec
.alb1re
.ale3u4
.2a1le
.a1li3
.al5l6en
.a2l1l
.al1le
.alle4r5
.al4lin
.al1li
.al1lo3
.al2l3s
.al4ma2u
.a2l1m
.al1ma
.al4pl2
.a2l1p
.al5s4e
.a2ls
.al4t5ak
.a2l1t
.al6t5a2n1g
.al2t6a2n6l2
.al4t5a2n6s
.al4tei
.al4t5e4l
.al6t5e2r6f
.al6t5e2r6p2
.alte2r6s5
.al4t3h
.al4ti
.al4tor
.al4t5ra
.altr2
.al4tri
.al4tro
.al2t3s4
.al4t3u
.a1l4u
.alu3s
.am1pe4
.a2mp
.am5s2ta
.2a2m2s
.ams1t
.am2t4s3
.a2m1t
.4ana3c
.a1na
.an3ae
.an5a2l3g
.a1na3t
.anden6ke
.a2n1d
.ande2n1k
.a1n3e
.ang4a
.a2n1g
.an5g4li
.ang4r2
.an2g2s4
.angs1t5
.ani4s
.2a1n2i
.ani1s5c
.a2n1k2
.anla6gent2ec
.1a2n1l2
.an3la
.anlage4n5
.anla1g
.anlage2n1t
.an3n4a
.a2n1n
.a1n3o2
.an4or2a
.an3or
.a2n1s2
.ansch4
.an1sc
.an4si.
.an1si
.an5sp2
.an4t2a1g
.a2n1t
.ant4i5s
.an3ti
.a2n1z2
.an5z1w
.3ap3fel5
.ap1fe
.app6le.
.a2p1p
.ap1p1l2
.app1le
.are3n
.a1re
.ar4m5ac
.a2r1m
.ar1ma
.ar4mar
.ar4m3a2u
.ar4mei
.ar1me
.ar4mun1
.ar1mu
.ar4sc
.a2r1s
.ar3s2c2h5l
.ar4tan
.a2r1t
.ar4ta2u
.ar4t5ei
.arter4
.ar6t5er1h2
.ar6t5e2r5k2
.ar4t3r2
.a2r1z2
.3ar2z1t3
.a2s2b2
.asbe4
.as2ie4
.a1si
.as4ko
.a2s1k2
.as2p2
.as4ta.
.as2ta
.as1t
.as5tar
.as4zen
.as1z2
.2ata3
.a1t
.at2e4m3
.at4h
.a2ue4n3
.a2u
.au1e
.au2f3
.au2f5s4
.auge4
.a2u1g
.au2s3
.aussen6dung.
.au2s1s2
.aus3se4n
.aus1se
.ausse2n1d
.aussendu2n1
.aussendu2n1g
.auto6r4en.
.3auto
.a2u1t
.au3t2o1re
.auto6ri2n
.auto1ri
.a1x2
.är2m4s
.ä2r1m
.är6s2c2hl
.ä2r1s
.är1sc
.ä2t2h
.ä1t
.ä2t2s
.bahner6
.1b
.ba2hn
.bah1n2e
.ba4ran
.ba1ra
.bau5chi
.ba2u
.b2a2uc
.baue2r6f
.bau1e
.bau3f4
.beige4
.b2ei
.be2i3g2
.b4ei6ge.
.3be3n4a
.b2en
.be3n4e
.be3r4a
.b2er
.be1r4e
.ber4ga
.be2r1g
.1berg5a1b
.berg5ar
.berg5a4s1t
.1ber6g5e6b
.ber6gin
.ber4g5l
.ber4g5o
.ber4g5r2
.ber2g5s1
.ber4t5r2
.be2r1t
.be3s4a
.b2e1s
.be6t5r4aum
.be1t
.betr2
.betra2u
.bi2e
.b2i
.bi2o1
.bi4o1s
.bi4t3a
.bi1t
.b4i4t3r2
.bl4a2u3
.bl2
.blei5s4
.ble4i
.b1le
.boge4
.b2o1g
.bogen5
.boge2n1s6
.bor4d5i
.bo2r1d
.bo4s3k2
.br2e4a
.br2
.b1re
.brecher6
.bre3che
.bre6che2r1k2
.bri1d4
.briefe2n6
.br2ie
.bri2e1f
.bri2e1fe
.brie6f5e2n1d2
.bru2c2h5s
.b2r2uc
.bru2t5s
.br2u1t
.bu6cher
.bu3che4
.b2uc
.buch1se6
.bu2c2hs
.bue5be2
.bu2e
.1b1u2e2b
.bu4ser
.b2us
.bu1se
.buster6
.bus1t
.b2u1ß3
.bü3be2
.1b1ü2b
.by2t
.b2y1
.ce4ra
.1cer
.ch2
.ch4a
.char6me.
.cha2r1m
.char1me
.char6m4es
.ch4i
.chi5er
.chi2e
.d1a1b2
.1d
.da6ch5en
.d1ac
.d4a3che4
.da3la
.da2n4c
.da2r
.d2ar5in
.da1r2i
.da2r4m3
.da2r3u
.d2a4te.
.da1t
.d2a4t2es
.dau1e4
.da2u
.de4al
.d2e1a
.de3ch
.de6ck5e1ri
.dec2k
.de1cke
.dein4
.de5i2n1s
.de5i2n1t
.de6m5en2t1s
.deme2n1t4
.de1m
.de1me
.de3n1a
.den4ka
.de2n1k
.den4kl2
.den4ko
.den4kr2
.denta4
.de2n1t
.1de3o1d2
.d2eo
.de5ra4n
.de4rei
.de1re
.de5r4en
.de5s1kr2
.de2s1k2
.des4pe
.d2e1sp2
.de4s1po
.des5s4e
.de2s1s2
.de3s1t
.des4ti
.de3x1a
.di2a
.di5ae4r
.di3ä4r
.di1ä
.di2e
.die5ne
.di1en
.die2n4s
.1dienst5a6d
.diens2ta
.diens1t
.diens2t5r2
.di5s4ti
.dis1t4
.do4mo
.3do2r1f3
.dor6fer
.dor1fe
.do4tr2
.do1t
.drah6t5en
.dr2
.d2rah
.dra2h1t
.dru6cker6zeu
.3d2r2uc
.druc2k
.dru1cke
.drucke2r1z
.d1u2e3b
.du6sc2hr2
.dus2ch
.du1sc
.d1ü3b
.d2y2s3
.eb2e4r
.e1b
.e2cho3
.eck5e2r1k2
.ec2k
.e1cke
.ede4l
.e1d
.e1h4e
.ehe3i4
.e4h3ein4
.e3he3n
.eh1re4
.e2hr
.eh4r5er
.ei2c2hs4
.e2ic
.eich5ste
.eichs1t
.eide4r5
.e2i1d
.e2i3e2
.eier3
.eigener6
.e2i1g
.eige1ne
.ei4la2u
.ei1la
.ein3a
.4ei4na1t
.ei1ne4
.4ei4n5e1b
.ei6n5e2n6g
.eins4p2
.ei2n1s
.eins6t2e1m
.eins1t
.einzel6li1g
.einz4el
.ei2n1z
.einze2l1l
.einzel1li
.eisen5
.e2i1se
.ei4s1pe
.eisp2
.ei2s3s4
.ei4s3t
.ei6ste
.ei4s3u
.ei4tr2
.e2i1t
.ek5lam
.e1k2l2
.ek3li
.e2k3s
.e1l4a
.el4b3i
.e2l1b
.el4bl2
.el2b5s
.el4fei
.e2l1f
.el1fe
.elfe2n1s6
.el4f2l
.en1
.en4d3a
.e2n1d
.en4d5ei
.en4d5er4
.en5d6er.
.en6d3os2t
.en4d3r2
.en2d3s
.en4due
.en4d2ü
.en4g3l
.e2n1g
.eng5s2t2a
.en2g2s1
.engs1t
.e2n1k2
.enn4s1t
.e2n1n
.en2n1s
.en4t3a
.e2n1t
.en4tä
.en4t5ei
.en4t2e1m
.en5t2ha2l1p
.en2t1h2a
.en4thi
.en4t5io
.en3ti
.en4toe
.en4t3r2
.en5trep
.ent2re
.en5t4r4op
.en2t3s4
.ep2i3c
.e1pi
.e3p3o4d
.e1po
.er6b5aen
.e2r1b
.erb2ae
.er4b5än
.er4b5ei
.er4b5er
.er6bre2c2h1t
.er5brec
.erb2r2
.erb1re
.er4bu
.er6d5a2c2hs
.e2r1d
.erd2ac
.er4dan
.er4dar
.er4d5ei
.er4del
.erde2n6k
.er3den
.er4d5ep
.er4d5er
.er6d5e2s1s2
.ere5ch
.er2e2c
.e1re
.er3ei
.er3er
.erfolgs3auto6
.e2r1f
.erfol2g4s1
.er1fo
.erfo2l1g
.erfolg4sa2u
.erfolg4sa2u1t
.erfolg1sa
.er3in
.e1ri
.e2r1k2
.er3lö
.e2r1l
.er2n4s
.e2rn
.er3o4b
.er3oe
.e2r1s2
.er6sta1b
.ers2ta
.ers1t
.er6s2t5ein
.ers4tei
.er6ster6
.er4st5e1ri
.e2r4st5e2r1s
.er6s2tim
.er6stritt.
.ers2tr2
.ers1tr2i1t
.ers1tri2t1t
.er6strit3t4en.
.erstrit3ten
.er4z5el
.e2r1z
.erzen4
.er6z5e2n1g
.er4z5er
.2e1s3p2
.es4s3t
.e2s1s
.es3ta4
.es1t
.es3te
.es5tra
.es2tr2
.est5ri
.et2h
.e1t
.e2t2s
.eu1
.euch4
.e2uc
.e2u3g2
.eur4
.e2u3t
.eve4r1
.2e1v
.ex3e1m
.e1xe
.fahrzeugin6
.1fa
.fa2hr
.fah2r1z2
.fahrzeu4g5i
.fahrze2u1g
.fan4gl
.fa2n1g
.fan2g5s1
.faus6t5r2
.fa2u
.faus1t
.fe3la2
.1fe
.3fel
.felden5
.fe2l1d
.fel4d5r2
.fel6la2u
.fe2l1l
.fel4s5a
.fe2ls
.fel4sp2
.fel4s5t
.fen2
.fer4n5o
.fe2rn
.fe4s1t
.fes2t5r2
.fi3d
.1fi
.fi5es1t
.fi4le.
.fi1le
.fi4len4
.fil4m5a
.fi2l1m
.fi2l4s3
.fi2n4s
.fi2r
.f4l2u4g3
.flus6s5e4n
.3f4lu2s1s
.flus1se
.former6
.1fo
.3f2o2r1m
.for1me
.for5tu
.fo2r1t
.fra4s
.fr2
.2fs2
.2fu4sc
.1fu
.f2us
.fus4s1t
.fu2s1s
.g4a4me.
.1g
.ga1me
.ga4mes
.gan4ga
.1ga2n1g
.gang5sc
.gan2g2s1
.garne2n6
.g2a2rn
.gar1ne
.gar6n5e2n1d
.ga2s
.g2a1s3e
.ga2s3s2
.gas5tein
.gas1t
.gas6tras
.gastr2
.ga2t
.ge1b2
.geb2e4a
.gege4n5
.1g2e1g
.gel4b5r2
.g4e2l1b
.ge3lu
.ge3n1a
.1gen6a2u1g
.gen1a2u
.ge3ne
.gene5cke
.gene4c2k
.ge2nec
.ge2n4ei
.ge3n1u
.ge3r4a
.ge1r4e
.ge3ro
.g2e3ru
.ge3sa
.ge1s2
.ge1s4e
.g2e1s4i
.g2e1s4p2
.ge5stak
.ges2ta
.ges1t
.ge7st6ei
.g2e3t4u
.ge1t
.g2i2u2
.gla4s5c
.gl2a
.gol6der
.go2l1d
.2gs2
.gu3ru
.h2a1fe4
.haf6ter
.ha2f1t
.haf2t5s4
.hal4br2
.ha2l1b
.2ha1n4a
.h1a2n4f
.han2g5s1
.ha2n1g
.ha5sche
.ha1sc
.hau4s5e2r6w
.hause4r
.ha2u
.hau1se
.hau4su
.ha2u1t3
.h3au4to
.he2r
.he5ra2e5
.her6b5ra
.he2r1b
.herb2r2
.he5rer
.he1re
.he3ri
.he6r5i2n1n
.he5ros3
.h2e4sp2
.h2ete3
.he1t
.he3x1a
.hi2n
.hin3a
.hin3u
.h2i2p1
.hi4s
.hit3z4e5
.hi1t
.hi2t1z
.ho4f5en
.ho1fe
.ho2f3s4
.h2o4la
.ho4me1t
.h2o1m4e
.4ho3ra
.hor4t5r2
.ho2r1t
.hö2c2h4s
.hö2c
.hu4fer
.hu1fe
.hu3l3a
.hu2n1d4
.hun1
.hu3s4a
.ia2
.ibe3
.i1b
.ima4ge
.i1ma
.ima1g
.i2m1m4
.imme4n4
.im1me
.in1
.i2n1d2
.i1ne2
.in3e1g
.i1n3i
.i2n1k4
.inse4l5
.i2n1s
.in1se
.in5s3kr2
.in2s1k2
.in1u3
.i1o2d3
.ioni5e
.i1on2
.i2o1n2i
.i1re3
.i1s2a
.is1a2r3
.it2h
.i1t
.j2o1n2i3
.1j
.jor3
.kabe4
.1ka
.ka1b
.ka4b5l2
.ka3la
.kal4ta
.ka2l1t
.kal4t5r2
.ka4t5i4o
.k2at2i
.ka1t
.ke3ra
.ker4bl2
.ke2r1b
.ker4na
.ke2rn
.ke3ro
.ke2t
.ki2e
.ko5be
.1ko
.ko1b
.ko4ter
.ko1t
.kraf4
.1kr2
.kra2f1t5
.2ks2
.k1u2e3b
.1ku
.ku4ran
.ku1ra
.k1ü3b
.1kü
.l4a5e2r1t
.la2e
.lage4n5
.la1g
.la3ho
.1lah
.lan4d5a
.3la2n1d
.lan6de6mi
.lande1m
.lan4dr2
.lan4gl
.la2n1g
.lan4g5r2
.lan2g5s4
.la2n3t
.l2a1se4
.las4t5r2
.la2s1t
.le4ar
.1le
.l2e1a
.leder5
.le1d
.le4gas
.l2e1g
.lei4bl2
.lei1b
.lei4br2
.leider6
.le4i1d
.lei6de2r1f4
.lei4tr2
.le2i1t
.le3n4i
.len4k5a
.le2n1k
.len4kl2
.len4kr2
.les3t
.le3th
.le1t
.lich6ter6sc
.1li
.l2ic
.li2c2h1t
.lichte2r1s
.l2i2f
.li5gn4
.li1g
.lin4k3l2
.li2n1k
.li3o
.li4ve.
.l2i1v
.lo4g5in3
.1lo
.l2o1g
.lo4sc
.l2osch5
.lo4s1k2
.2lo2s1s4
.los3t
.lo3th
.lo1t
.lo4tr2
.lo5ve2r1
.l1o1v
.2lo2ve
.lus4t5e
.lu2s1t
.luster6
.lu5t4h
.l2u1t
.l2y2s3
.1ly
.ma5la2e
.1ma
.ma2l5e4c
.m2a1le
.ma5len
.mal4z5a
.ma2l1z
.ma2n3d4
.m4ani4e
.m2a1n2i
.ma2n5t
.mas4s5u
.ma2s1s
.ma4s1t
.ma4ß3u
.ma1ß
.ma2t4c
.ma1t
.mate3
.mä2r2z3
.1mä
.2m1d2
.me2e4r3u2
.1me
.3m2ee
.me1l4a
.me3no
.men6s2c2hl
.me2n1s
.men1sc
.men6s4c2h2w2
.me3n4u
.me3nü
.me4s2a
.mes4sp2
.me2s1s
.mes4s1t
.me4to
.me1t
.met6te2n1d
.met3te4n
.me2t1t
.mi2e
.1mi
.mie4t5r2
.mie1t
.m2i2f
.mi2l4z3
.mi4s3a
.mi6scha
.mi1sc
.mi6s4chei
.mi6s2c2h5l
.mi6s2c2hn2
.mi6sc4ho
.mi6sc2h5r2
.mi6s4c2h5w2
.mi2t
.mi4t3a
.m2it3e2
.mit5i2n3
.2m1m2
.mo2i
.1mo
.mo4n1a2u
.m2o1na
.mon6dru
.mo2n1d
.mondr2
.möbe4
.1mö
.mö1b2
.musik5er6fo
.1mu
.m2us
.mu1si
.musi1k
.musike2r1f
.nabe4
.n1a1b
.nae4s5c
.n2a4h2a
.1n2ah
.nah5ei
.na1he
.name2n1s5
.3n4ame4n
.na1me
.na4mes
.nas4s5c
.na2s1s
.na3t4h
.1na1t
.n2a3t2o
.n2ä4s3c
.1nä
.neb2e4n
.1ne
.ne1b
.nebe2n1s6
.neider6
.2n1ei
.ne2i1d
.nei6d5e2r1r2
.n2e1re3
.ne2r4f
.ne3ro
.ne2s
.neue2r6b
.ne2u
.neu1e
.nich6t5e
.1n2i
.n2ic
.ni2c2h1t
.ni4e
.nie5r
.ni2l
.ni1l3a
.no6tent2r2
.1no
.n2o1t
.note4n
.no1te2n1t
.no4t3h
.no4top
.no2t3r2
.nude4
.1n2u1d
.nul6ler
.nul3le4
.nu2l1l
.1n2us2
.nu4t3r2
.1n2u1t
.oa3s
.o1a
.2ob2e4n
.o1b
.obe6r5ei
.ob2er
.obe1re
.ob6e2r1s
.ob3i4t
.2ob2i
.ob3l2
.ob2s4k2
.o2b1s
.ob4s2ta
.obs2t
.oe2
.oh4r5ei
.oh1re2
.o2hr
.oh4rer
.oper4
.o1pe
.orge4
.o2r1g
.orgi3
.ort4s5a
.o2r1t
.or2ts
.ort4s5e
.or1t4s1t2
.os4t3a4
.os1t
.ost5e4c
.os4t5ei
.os6t5en6de
.o4ste4n
.oste2n1d
.os6te2n1g
.oste6r5e
.o2s4t2es
.os4ti
.osto4
.os4t5om
.ost5ran
.os2tr2
.ost5ri
.ot3a
.o1t
.ou4te
